Massachusetts, session 194th, S1656.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 3 of said chapter 276A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-   
The probation officers of a district or municipal court, or an official designee of such a 
probation officer, when gathering information in accordance with section 85 of chapter 276, shall 
also screen each defendant for the purpose of enabling the judge at arraignment to consider the 
eligibility of the defendant for diversion to a program. The probation officers or an official 
designee shall also confirm the defendant's status as a veteran or as a person on active service in 
the armed forces of the United States and shall determine if the defendant has previously been 
diverted pursuant to clause (ii) of subsection (c) of section 4. Any person identified as a veteran, 
as defined in said clause, shall be provided with a list of contact information for the Veteran’s 

of 2 11 Administration, the local Veteran Justice Officer, their local Veteran Service Officer and the 
Veterans Administration Department of Veteran Services Suicide Hotline.   
SECTION 2. The first paragraph of section 3 of chapter 276A, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by adding after the first paragraph the following paragraph:  
Once a veteran is identified by the indigency verification process, the office of probation 
shall refer said veteran to the Veteran Justice Officer for determination of Federal Benefits.